District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.11

Registered office and registered agent required — Change.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 184, ch. 269, § 11
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 3
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 239, Pub. L. 86-106, § 1
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 136, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(2)
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(c)-(f), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.11.
1981 Ed., § 29-311.
1973 Ed., § 29-907a.